District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.20

Other considerations of directors.

Unless the articles of organization otherwise provide, in considering the best interests of a limited cooperative association, a director of the association in discharging the duties of director, in conjunction with considering the long and short term interest of the association and its patron members, may consider:

(1)

The interest of employees, customers, and suppliers of the association;

(2)

The interest of the community in which the association operates; and

(3)

Other cooperative principles and values that may be applied in the context of the decision.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09 and § 29-1008.18.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 820 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition